ko: 헤드 구성: 자귀; 자귀 및 망치; 망치; 없음; 기타
lt-LT: Galvutės konfigūracija: Skaptas; Skaptas ir plaktukas; Plaktukas; Nėra; Kita
da: Hovedkonfiguration: Skovl; Skovl og hammer; Hammer; Ingen; Andet
th: การกำหนดค่าหัว: หัวสับ; หัวสับและค้อน; ค้อน; ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
fi: Terän kokoonpano: Telso; Telso ja vasara; Vasara; Ei mitään; Muu
sv: Huvudkonfiguration: Skovel; Skovel och hammare; Hammare; Ingen; Övrigt
es: Configuración de la cabeza: Azuela; Azuela y martillo; Martillo; Ninguno; Otro
pt-PT: Configuração da cabeça: Enxó; Enxó e martelo; Martelo; Nenhuma; Outra
nl: Kop configuratie: Dissel; Dissel en hamer; Hamer; Geen; Overig
zh-TW: 頭部配置: 扁斧; 扁斧與槌; 槌; 無; 其他
hu: Fejkonfiguráció: Kapa; Kapa és kalapács; Kalapács; Nincs; Egyéb
sl-SI: Konfiguracija glave: Lopatka; Lopatka in kladivo; Kladivo; Brez; Drugo
it: Configurazione della testa: Paletta; Paletta e martello; Martello; Nessuna; Altro
en: Head configuration: Adze; Adze and hammer; Hammer; None; Other
bg-BG: Конфигурация на главата: Тесла; Тесла и чук; Чук; Няма; Друго
de: Kopfkonfiguration: Dechsel; Dechsel und Hammer; Hammer; Keine; Sonstige
vi: Cấu hình đầu: Rìu tay; Rìu tay và búa; Búa; Không có; Khác
tr: Baş yapılandırması: Keser; Keser ve çekiç; Çekiç; Yok; Diğer
nb: Hodekonfigurasjon: Tverrblad; Tverrblad og hammer; Hammer; Ingen; Annet
cs: Konfigurace hlavy: Teslice; Teslice a kladivo; Kladivo; Žádná; Jiné
pl: Konfiguracja głowicy: Łopatka; Łopatka i młotek; Młotek; Brak; Inna
pt-BR: Configuração da cabeça: Enxó; Enxó e martelo; Martelo; Nenhum; Outra
ro-RO: Configurația capului: Teslă; Teslă și ciocan; Ciocan; Fără; Altele
ja: ヘッド構成: アッズ; アッズおよびハンマー; ハンマー; なし; その他
hr-HR: Konfiguracija glave: Tesla; Tesla i čekić; Čekić; Bez; Ostalo
zh-CN: 头部配置: 扁斧; 扁斧和锤头; 锤头; 无; 其他
ru: Конфигурация головки: Тесло; Тесло и молоток; Молоток; Нет; Другое
sk-SK: Konfigurácia hlavy: Lopatka; Lopatka a kladivo; Kladivo; Žiadna; Iné
el: Διαμόρφωση κεφαλής: Σκεπάρνι; Σκεπάρνι και σφυρί; Σφυρί; Κανένα; Άλλο
fr: Configuration de la tête: Herminette; Herminette et marteau; Marteau; Aucun; Autre